North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 8. Municipal Cemeteries. [Repealed]

§ 65-37.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-118, s. 5, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to all trusts created on or after that date.

§ 65-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 1279.

§§ 65-39,
65-40.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-118, s. 5, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to all trusts created on or after that date.